Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2012
State plan; need; construction.

The state plan shall set forth the relative need for the several projects included in the construction program determined in accordance with regulations prescribed pursuant to the federal act, and provide for the construction, insofar as financial resources available therefor and for maintenance and operations make possible, in the order of such relative need.

Laws 1947, c. 232, § 12, p. 737.